District of Columbia statutes.
1-127

Appropriations.

There is authorized to be appropriated from the General Fund of the District of Columbia an amount for the salaries and office expenses of the elected representatives to the Senate and House referred to in § 1-123(d) during the period of their service prior to the admission of the proposed new state into the union.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-171, § 8, 27 DCR 4732
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-35, § 2(g), 28 DCR 3376
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 19, 32 DCR 30
1981 Ed., § 1-117.